Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 5
CHILD WELFARE SERVICES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

26-5-100.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Each year, for a variety of reasons, more than three hundred youth, ages eighteen to twenty-one, exit Colorado's foster care system without a permanent home or a stable support network;

These youth do not have the same safety nets, supportive adults, and support networks as do other youth their age;

Many of these youth will face challenges as they search for affordable housing, pursue higher education or training, search for employment, manage tight budgets, take care of their health needs, and much more;

Youth in foster care face not only the typical developmental changes and new experiences that are common to youth their age but also the dramatic change from being under the county's care to being on their own, many without any supportive adults or safety net to help them succeed;

The array of services and supports available to youth while in the foster care system, including housing, food, medical care, and caseworker support, disappear as soon as the youth exits foster care. Additionally, many of these youth are dealing with the long-term consequences of trauma related to the abuse, neglect, removal, and overall lack of resources that they may have experienced.

By leveraging the expertise of youth who have successfully made the transition to adulthood, as well as experts in the field, many states have developed creative approaches to address the needs of these youth;

Colorado can start addressing the needs of youth by allowing counties to use existing child welfare money to provide continued supportive services for youth who exit the foster care system; and

Although existing child welfare money may enable the state to provide services to some youth, it is insufficient to address all the need, nor is it available consistently across the state.

Therefore, the general assembly determines that by coupling the short-term approach of using existing child welfare money with the creation of a steering committee tasked with developing a long-term implementation plan for services for a successful adulthood for youth who were formerly in the state's foster care system, the state can better meet the needs of youth who are making the transition from the foster care system to successful adulthood.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1319), ch. 217, p. 1388, § 1, effective May 18.

26-5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Capped allocation" means a capped amount of funds distributed to counties or a group of counties for the purpose of providing all or a portion of the child welfare services as defined in subsection (3) of this section.

(1.5) "Caseload" means the number of children who are eligible for child welfare services that are defined in subsection (3) of this section and who are currently receiving such child welfare services on a regular basis from a county.

"Child welfare allocations committee" means a committee that is organized and authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 26-5-103.5.

"Child welfare services" means the provision of necessary shelter, sustenance, and guidance to or for children who are or who, if such services are not provided, are likely to become neglected or dependent, as defined in section 19-3-102. "Child welfare services" includes but is not limited to:

Child protection;

Risk assessment;

Permanency planning;

Treatment planning;

Case management;

Core services, as defined in rules promulgated by the state department, as authorized in sections 26-5-102 and 26-5.5-104;

Adoption and subsidized adoption;

Emergency shelter;

Out-of-home placement, including foster care;

Utilization review;

Early intervention and prevention;

Youth-in-conflict functions;

Administration and support functions;

Services described in section 19-3-208;

Provision of verifiable documents to youth who plan to emancipate from foster care.

Verifiable documents shall include, but need not be limited to, a certified copy of the youth's birth certificate and a social security card. The cost of providing the verifiable documents shall not be borne by the youth.

Foster care prevention services, as defined in section 26-5.4-102 (1).

Services that address abuse, neglect, and youth-in-conflict issues for runaway, homeless, and unaccompanied youth, as defined in rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to sections 26-5-102 and 26-5.7-105.

"County" means a county or a city and county or any two or more counties.

(4.1) "County department" means a county department of human or social services.

(4.5) "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018" means Titles IV-B and IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

(4.7) "Former foster care youth" means a youth at least eighteen years of age but younger than twenty-one years of age who was formerly in the legal custody or legal authority of a county department and who was placed in a certified or noncertified kinship care placement, as defined in section 26-6-903, a certified or licensed facility, or a foster care home, as defined in section 26-6-903, and certified pursuant to part 9 of article 6 of this title 26.

"Governing body" means the board of county commissioners of a county or the city council and mayor of a city and county.

(5.5) "Services for a successful adulthood" means supportive services that help former foster care youth achieve self-sufficiency. "Services for a successful adulthood" may include, but is not limited to, assistance with education, employment, financial management, housing, mental health care, and substance abuse prevention. "Services for a successful adulthood" does not include out-of-home placement, as described in section 26-5-102 (2)(i).

(5.8) "Steering committee" means the former foster care youth steering committee established pursuant to section 26-5-114.

"Targeted allocation" means a fixed amount of funds from a capped allocation to a group of counties that is designated for a specific county within that group of counties.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1195, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-4-1.

L. 78:

(1) amended, p. 367, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 794, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 821, § 39, effective October 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1696, § 40, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1426, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(1) and (2) amended and (1.5) added, p. 780, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 10, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(3)(m) and (3)(n) amended and (3)(o) added, (SB 09-104), ch. 218, p. 983, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

IP amended and (4.5) added, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1374, § 3, effective May 18; IP amended and (4.1), (4.7), (5.5), and (5.8) added, (HB 18-1319), ch. 217, p. 1389, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

IP(3) and (3)(n) amended and (3)(p) added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2461, § 9, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(3)(q) added, (SB 20-106), ch. 128, p. 552, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(4.7) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 857, § 97, effective July 1.

26-5-102. Provision of child welfare services - system reform goals - out-of-home placements for children and youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities - reporting - rules - definition.

The state department shall adopt rules to establish a program of child welfare services, administered by the state department or supervised by the state department and administered by the county departments, and, where applicable, in accordance with the conditions accompanying available federal funds for such purpose. The rules shall establish a fee based upon the child support guidelines set forth in section 14-10-115, C.R.S., requiring those persons legally responsible for the child to pay for all, or a portion, of the services provided under this article. Notwithstanding the rules establishing a fee for services provided under this article, when it serves the best interest of a child, a county department may exempt a family from responsibility for payment of fees for core services, as defined in rules promulgated by the state department. The state department is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this article relating to the allocation of funds to counties for the delivery of child welfare services.

Upon appropriate request and within available appropriations, child welfare services shall be provided for any child residing or present in the state of Colorado who is in need of such services. Foster care fees shall be considered child support obligations, and all remedies for the enforcement and collection of child support shall apply. Foster care fees established pursuant to section 14-10-115, C.R.S., may be collected pursuant to the administrative procedures to establish child support enforcement set forth in article 13.5 of this title. Due process is guaranteed in all actions regarding any such administrative process concerning foster care fees, and a court hearing of the matter before the district court may be obtained in the manner prescribed in section 26-13.5-105. Nothing contained in article 13.5 of this title shall be construed to deprive a court of competent jurisdiction from determining the duty of support of any obligor against whom an administrative order is issued pursuant to this article.

Reforms in child welfare and related delivery systems must be directed at the following objectives:

More efficient and responsive service systems for children, youth, and families;

Increased flexibility and collaboration across multiple agencies and funding streams to ensure the delivery of services based on the needs of the child or youth;

Encouragement and authorization for a truly integrated service system that incorporates blended funding and administration;

Focus on quality and outcome-driven services with accountability for an entire array of services that families need, rather than forcing families to be transferred from agency to agency;

Development of data systems to support these goals and to allow administrators and policy makers to better manage and evaluate;

Authority and incentives for creative solutions at the local level that are not bound by the constraints of current agency barriers and categorical funding streams, including authority for local policy makers to create new entities incorporating blended funding and administration;

Successful training efforts directed at county staff, judges, court staff, providers, parents, and families and other appropriate entities that are involved in managed care service systems, which training efforts shall include, but not be limited to, the operation of the child welfare training academy created in section 26-5-109. Notwithstanding any limitation of the "M" notation of the appropriation in the annual appropriation act for child welfare services, the state department is authorized to expend any additional federal or private funding that may be available to support the training efforts identified in this subsection (2).

Promotion of the development of a family-centered, community-based strategy for placement decisions that includes team decision making, family-group decision making, or other agency decision making processes that involve the family and community supports;

Promotion of the local placement of children with families by recruiting and supporting foster care homes within the neighborhoods and communities in which identified children reside;

Successful transition of individuals eighteen to twenty years of age with intellectual and developmental disabilities to adult services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to section 25.5-6-409.5, C.R.S.

On or before August 1, 2018, the state department shall develop a program to serve children and youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are placed by county departments of human or social services in a licensed out-of-home setting, as defined in section 26-6-903, and children or youth committed to or in the custody of the state department.

The state department shall promulgate rules concerning the placement of children or youth in the program. The rules must include, but need not be limited to, quality assurance monitoring, admissions, discharge planning, appropriate length of stay, and an appeals process for children or youth who are determined to be ineligible for the program or who are being removed from the program before meeting discharge criteria, as defined by the child's or youth's treatment plan, and without the consent of a parent, legal guardian, or county department. The rules regarding the appeals process must include access to the interdisciplinary appeals review panel, referenced in section 26-6-106 (3). For an appeal pursuant to this subsection (3)(b), the panel shall include the members appointed pursuant to section 26-6-106 (3) and, at a minimum:

A representative from a county department;

A treatment director or coordinator for a residential treatment program;

A staff member from a program-approved service agency that offers residential habilitation; and

A representative from the department of health care policy and financing with expertise in the children's habilitation residential program, as described in this section.

All members of the interdisciplinary appeals review panel assembled pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section shall not be associated with the child or youth who is the subject of the appeal and the child's or youth's placement provider. If a parent, legal guardian, county department, program provider, or the state department is not satisfied with the interdisciplinary appeals review panel recommendation, that party to the appeal is entitled to a review by an independent hearing officer at a state hearing.

On or before December 31, 2018, the state department shall contract with licensed providers for the delivery of services to children and youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are placed in the program. The state department shall utilize a request for proposal process to define the scope of the contract and to select the licensed providers. The providers must be approved by the department of health care policy and financing as service providers for children eligible for enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program waiver established pursuant to section 25.5-6-903.

A county department that wishes to place a child or youth in the program shall submit an application to the state department for review. Within seven days of making an application to the state department for placement of a child or youth in the program, a county department shall refer the child or youth to be assessed for enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program, or assist the parent or legal guardian who retains legal custody to make the referral. The county department shall provide to the state department evidence that the county department or the child's parent or legal guardian has referred the child or youth for enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program or evidence of either enrollment in or denial of enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program, depending on whether the child or youth is eligible or ineligible for such enrollment. The state department shall approve admissions into the program and determine discharge criteria for each placement. Enrollment of a child or youth in the children's habilitation residential program does not constitute automatic placement with a service provider contracted with pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section. A county department that has applied for the admission of a child or youth into the program must be notified in writing of a placement approved by the state department.

For the duration of the treatment, as defined in the approval letter from the state department, and for thirty days after the completion of treatment, the state department shall reimburse the provider directly for costs associated with the placement of a child or youth in the program.

The state department shall notify the county department that is responsible for the placement of the child or youth of the date on which the reimbursement eligibility will expire. Upon expiration of the reimbursement eligibility, if the child or youth remains in placement at the facility, the county department is responsible for one hundred percent of the placement costs.

A county department that has placed a child or youth in the program retains the right to remove the child or youth from the program any time prior to the discharge date specified by the state department.

The state department shall reimburse the provider one hundred percent of the cost of unutilized beds in the program to ensure available space for emergency residential out-of-home placements.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(i) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Entities other than county departments, including but not limited to hospitals, health-care providers, and providers of case management services, may refer a family to voluntarily apply for placement with a service provider contracted with pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section and may assist with the application to the state department for admission of the family's child or youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities into the program pursuant to this subsection (3). The applications will be considered if space is available. The entity may refer the family to a provider of case management services or assist the family with the process of enrolling the child or youth in the children's habilitation residential program if the child or youth is eligible. However, children and youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities placed by county departments or the state department must have priority for admission to the program. The state department shall not accept applications for placement of a child or youth who is exclusively insured by private insurance. A child or youth who is dually insured by private insurance and medicaid and whose residential level of care has been denied by private insurance may be eligible for services in the program. A child or youth who is eligible for enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program must be enrolled.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(i) is effective July 1, 2024.] Entities other than county departments, including but not limited to hospitals, health-care providers, providers of case management services, and case management agencies, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, may refer a family to voluntarily apply for placement with a service provider contracted with pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section and may assist with the application to the state department for admission of the family's child or youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities into the program pursuant to this subsection (3). The applications will be considered if space is available. The entity may refer the family to a provider of case management services or assist the family with the process of enrolling the child or youth in the children's habilitation residential program if the child or youth is elegible. However, children and youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities placed by county departments or the state department must have priority for admission to the program. The state department shall not accept applications for placement of a child or youth who is exclusively insured by private insurance. A child or youth who is dually insured by private insurance and medicaid and whose residential level of care has been denied by private insurance may be eligible for services in the program. A child or youth who is eligible for enrollment in the children's habilitation residential program must be enrolled.

Any family that is voluntarily applying for placement with assistance from any entity defined in subsection (3)(i) of this section shall work directly with the provider to determine responsibility for payment.

The state department may maintain up to three open beds specifically for children and youth in the custody of a county or committed to or in the custody of the state department who may need services on an emergency basis.

On or before February 1, 2023, and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), every February 1 thereafter, the state department shall report the following information from the previous calendar year to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees:

The number of children or youth who met transition or discharge criteria and left the program;

The total number of applications received for the program during the applicable year and the number of applicants who:

Met program eligibility criteria;

Did not meet program eligibility criteria;

Were admitted to the program; and

Were added to the wait list;

The number of children or youth removed from the wait list and placed in the program;

The number of children or youth removed from the program before meeting transition criteria and the reason or reasons for removal;

The number of appeals to the interdisciplinary appeals review panel during the previous year, including the number that were approved and the number that were denied;

The number of beds during each month that were:

Open or unoccupied;

Occupied; or

Used for emergency placements; and

The average length of stay.

As used in this section, "county department" means a county department of human or social services.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1195, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-4-2.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 594, § 21, effective July 10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 215, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1788, § 73, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1564, § 17, effective September 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 707, § 1, effective May 18; entire section amended, p. 781, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(2)(h) and (2)(i) added, p. 353, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(2)(g) amended, (SB 09-164), ch. 276, p. 1239, § 1, effective May 19.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1115), ch. 120, p. 402, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(2)(j) added, (HB 14-1368), ch. 304, p. 1291, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 2015:

(2)(i) amended, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1020, § 15, effective June 2.

L. 2018:

(3) and (4) added, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1374, § 4, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, (SB 21-278), ch. 344, p. 2241, § 3, effective June 25; (3)(c), (3)(d), (3)(e), (3)(i), and (3)(j) amended, (SB 21-276), ch. 342, p. 2228, § 1, effective June 25; (3)(i) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 346, § 53, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 857, § 98, effective July 1; (3)(b) amended and (3)(b.5) and (3)(l) added, (SB 22-102), ch. 29, p. 171, § 1, effective August 10.

26-5-103. Coordination with other programs.

The program of child welfare services established pursuant to this article shall be coordinated with other social services and assistance payments programs for children of this state and shall be rendered in complement of, and not in duplication of or contrary to, legal processes provided by the "Colorado Children's Code" and services rendered under any public assistance law or other law for the benefit of children, including assistance under the Colorado works program, as described in part 7 of article 2 of this title.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1195, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-4-3.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1243, § 46, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Children's Code", see title 19.

26-5-103.5. Child welfare allocations committee - organization - duties - funding model - definition - repeal.

The state department shall convene a child welfare allocations committee as necessary in order to perform the duties described in this section and make advisory recommendations as described in this article 5.

The child welfare allocations committee consists of thirteen members, ten of whom must be appointed by county commissioners and three of whom must be appointed by the state department, and the child welfare allocations committee consists of two nonvoting members who must be appointed by the state department.

The two nonvoting members appointed by the state department must have knowledge and experience in the following areas, including but not limited to:

Federal funding related to child welfare;

The federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", as defined in section 26-5-101 (4.5);

Interests of individuals with a disability; or

Interests of individuals experiencing poverty.

Of the members appointed by county commissioners, only one representative per county may serve on the child welfare allocations committee at the same time, and:

One member must be appointed by the county commissioners of each of the following regions, as those regions are defined in subsection (2)(d) of this section:

The eastern region;

The front range region;

The mountain region;

The southern region; and

The western region;

Three members must be at-large appointments. Of the three at-large appointments, two members must be appointed by the county commissioners of the counties described in section 26-5-104 (4)(b)(I), and one must be appointed by the county commissioners who represent the counties described in section 26-5-104 (4)(b)(II); and

Two members must be representatives from the two counties in the state with the greatest percentage of the state's child welfare caseload. County commissioners in the two counties with the greatest percentage of the state's child welfare caseload shall each appoint one member from their counties to serve on the child welfare allocations committee.

For the purposes of this subsection (2):

The eastern region is comprised of Cheyenne, Elbert, Kit Carson, Lincoln, Logan, Morgan, Phillips, Sedgwick, Washington, and Yuma counties;

The front range region is comprised of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, and Weld counties, and the city and county of Broomfield and the city and county of Denver;

The mountain region is comprised of Chaffee, Clear Creek, Custer, Eagle, Fremont, Gilpin, Grand, Jackson, Lake, Park, Pitkin, Summit, and Teller counties;

The southern region is comprised of Alamosa, Baca, Bent, Conejos, Costilla, Crowley, Huerfano, Kiowa, Las Animas, Mineral, Otero, Prowers, Pueblo, Rio Grande, and Saguache counties; and

The western region is comprised of Archuleta, Delta, Dolores, Garfield, Gunnison, Hinsdale, La Plata, Mesa, Moffat, Montezuma, Montrose, Ouray, Rio Blanco, Routt, San Juan, and San Miguel counties.

As used in this subsection (2), "county commissioners" means:

The board of county commissioners in each county;

In the city and county of Denver, the department or agency with the responsibility for public assistance and welfare activities; and

In the city and county of Broomfield, the city council or a board or commission appointed by the city and county of Broomfield.

The child welfare allocations committee shall develop its own operating procedures.

Repealed.

(4.5) (a) On or before August 1, 2021, and on or before August 1 of each year thereafter, the child welfare allocations committee shall identify components of the funding model that should be evaluated by the funding model evaluation group pursuant to section 26-5-103.7.

In order to ensure the integrity of the funding model described in section 26-5-103.7, on or before September 1, 2021, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter, the child welfare allocations committee shall:

Establish expectations for gathering and using data in the funding model to ensure consistency within the funding model;

Identify county training and capacity needs to ensure integrity of the data collected and used in the Colorado TRAILS case management system and county financial management systems; and

Develop strategies and recommend changes to data systems that support the funding model and to financial policies and practices to ensure that appropriate, consistent, and accurate data can be used to inform the funding model.

The child welfare allocations committee shall provide input to the state department concerning the measurements and metrics for counties to receive incentives recommended by the delivery of child welfare services task force made pursuant to section 26-5-105.8.

The child welfare allocations committee shall also perform any duties required in section 26-5-103.7 related to the child welfare allocations funding model.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

Repealed.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 781, § 4, effective May 22.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1087), ch. 37, p. 106, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2015:

(5) added, (SB 15-242), ch. 141, p. 430, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2016:

(6) added, (SB 16-201), ch. 171, p. 542, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1376, § 5, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(c) amended and (2)(e) added, (SB 19-031), ch. 84, p. 298, § 1, effective April 8.

L. 2021:

(1), (2)(a), IP(2)(c), (2)(c)(III), and (3) amended, (4) and (7) repealed, and (4.5) added, (SB 21-277), ch. 343, p. 2237, § 3, effective June 25.